Louisiana, session 2026, SB310.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3384 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3384. Pregnancy information; student health centers
A.(1) Any student health center on the campus of a public postsecondary
education institution shall display signs approved or provided by the Louisiana
Department of Health, and its designated nonprofit organization, in the
prescribed locations and in the manner provided for in this Subsection.
(a) The text of each sign shall read as follows:
"Pregnant? Help Is Available for You and Your Baby!"
(b) A website link to the department's pregnancy information and
pregnancy resources shall be printed on the sign.
(2) The department, or its designated nonprofit organization, shall design
and produce the signs. Each sign shall incorporate color graphics. Each sign
shall be printed on durable signage material that is at least sixteen inches by
twenty inches, and the text shall be printed in a large, easily readable font.
B. Student health center staff shall display the signs in each patient
admission area, patient waiting room, and patient consultation room.
C. This Subsection does not require the Louisiana Department of Health
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 310 ENROLLED
to spend its funds to purchase such signs. The Louisiana Department of Health
may spend donated funds to purchase the signs provided for in this Section or
may accept donated signs provided for in this Section as long as the donated
signs are approved by the Louisiana Department of Health.
D. As used in this Section, "designated nonprofit organization" means
a private, nonprofit organization that is tax-exempt under the United States
Internal Revenue Code, pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3), and that is designated
by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health to assist the department
in furtherance of the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 40:31.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§31.4. Pregnancy information; health centers in schools
A.(1) Any school health center as provided in R.S. 40:31.3 in a public
high school shall display signs provided by the Louisiana Department of Health,
or its designated nonprofit organization, in the prescribed locations and in the
manner provided for in this Subsection.
(a) The text of each sign shall read as follows:
"Pregnant? Help Is Available for You and Your Baby!"
(b) A website link to the department's pregnancy information and
pregnancy resources shall be printed on the sign.
(2) The department, or its designated nonprofit organization, shall design
and produce the signs. Each sign shall incorporate color graphics. Each sign
shall be printed on durable signage material that is at least sixteen inches by
twenty inches, and the text shall be printed in a large, easily readable font.
B. Student health center staff shall display the signs in each patient
admission area, patient waiting room, and patient consultation room.
C. This Subsection does not require the Louisiana Department of Health
to spend its funds to purchase such signs. The Louisiana Department of Health
may spend donated funds to purchase the signs provided for in this Section or
may accept donated signs provided for in this Section as long as the donated
signs are approved by the Louisiana Department of Health.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 310 ENROLLED
D. As used in this Section, "designated nonprofit organization" means
a private, nonprofit organization that is tax-exempt under the United States
Internal Revenue Code, pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3), and that is designated
by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health to assist the department
in furtherance of the provisions of this Section.
Section 3. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Signs of Hope Act".
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.